Connecticut, session 2026, HB05412.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) There is established an
2 account to be known as the "Military Department emergency response
3 account", which shall be a separate, nonlapsing account. The account
4 shall contain any moneys required or permitted by law to be deposited
5 in the account. Any balance remaining in the account at the end of any
6 fiscal year shall be carried forward in the account for the fiscal year next
7 succeeding.
8 (b) The Adjutant General shall administer the account. Moneys in the
9 account shall be used for the purpose of covering costs incurred by the
10 Military Department, or by other state personnel and resources, in
11 responding to an emergency, including, but not limited to, any natural
12 disaster, civil emergency or other event requiring a state response,
13 whenever federal moneys for such purpose are not immediately
sHB5412 / File No. 150 1

sHB5412 File No. 150
14 available, provided any such use shall be approved by the Governor in
15 consultation with the Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public
16 Protection.
17 Sec. 2. (Effective July 1, 2026) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
18 the Treasurer shall transfer the sum of five hundred thousand dollars
19 from the Military Relief Fund, established under section 27-100a of the
20 general statutes, to the Military Department emergency response
21 account, established under section 1 of this act.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(b), "Military Department shall" was changed to "Adjutant
General shall" for consistency with standard drafting conventions.
VA Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5412 / File No. 150 2

sHB5412 File No. 150
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Military Dept. Military Relief 500,000 None
Fund - Transfer
from
Military Dept. Military 500,000 None
Department
Emergency
Response
Account -
Transfer to
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill creates a separate, nonlapsing account called the Military
Department Emergency Response Account and transfers $500,000 from
the Military Relief Fund to this new account. As of March 19, 2026, the
Military Relief Fund has a balance of $948,081.
The Out Years
There is no fiscal impact in the out years.
sHB5412 / File No. 150 3

sHB5412 File No. 150
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5412
AN ACT ESTABLISHING THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
EMERGENCY RESPONSE ACCOUNT.